California statutes. Vehicle Code
(1) The installation of a cover over a lawfully parked vehicle to protect it from the weather and the elements does not constitute a violation of this subdivision. A peace officer or other regularly salaried employee of a public agency designated to enforce laws, including local ordinances, relating to the parking of vehicles may temporarily remove so much of the cover as is necessary
 to inspect any license plate, tab, or indicia of registration on a vehicle.

(2) The installation of a license plate security cover is not a violation of this subdivision if the device does not obstruct or impair the recognition of the license plate information, including, but not limited to, the issuing state, license plate number, and registration tabs, and the cover is limited to the area directly over the top of the registration tabs. No portion of a license plate security cover shall rest over the license plate number.

(d) A casing, shield, frame, border, shade, tint, product, or other device that obstructs or impairs the reading or recognition of a license plate by an electronic device operated by state or local law enforcement, an electronic device operated in connection with a toll
 road, high-occupancy toll lane, toll bridge, or other toll facility, or a remote emission sensing device, as specified in Sections 44081 and 44081.6 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be installed on, or affixed to, a vehicle.

(e) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that an accommodation be made to persons with disabilities and to those persons who regularly transport persons with disabilities, to allow the removal and relocation of wheelchair lifts and wheelchair carriers without the necessity of removing and reattaching the vehicle’s rear license plate. Therefore, it is not a violation of this section if the reading or recognition of a rear license plate is obstructed or impaired by a wheelchair lift or wheelchair carrier and all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The owner of the vehicle has been issued a special identification license plate pursuant to Section 5007, or the person using the wheelchair that is carried on the vehicle has been issued a distinguishing placard under Section 22511.55.

(B) (i) The operator of the vehicle displays a decal, designed and issued by the department, that contains the license plate number assigned to the vehicle transporting the wheelchair.

(ii) The decal is displayed on the rear window of the vehicle, in a location determined by the department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, so as to be clearly visible to law enforcement.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if a decal is
 displayed pursuant to this subdivision, the requirements of this code that require the illumination of the license plate and the license plate number do not apply.

(3) The department shall adopt regulations governing the procedures for accepting and approving applications for decals, and issuing decals, authorized by this subdivision.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to a front license plate.

(f) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (AB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.1.

(a) A person shall not sell or manufacture a product or device in this state that obscures, or is intended to obscure, the reading or recognition of a license plate by visual means, or by an electronic device as prohibited by subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 5201.

(b) A person shall not operate a vehicle with a product or device that violates subdivision (a).

(c) A person shall not erase the reflective coating of, paint over the reflective coating of, or alter a license plate to avoid visual or electronic capture of the license plate or its characters.

(d) (1) A conviction for a violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per item sold or manufactured.

(2) A conviction for a violation of subdivision (b) or (c) is punishable by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   (AB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

(a) A license plate issued by this state or any other jurisdiction within or without the United States shall be attached upon receipt and remain attached during the period of its validity to the vehicle for which it is issued while being operated within this state or during the time the vehicle is being held for sale in this state, or until the time that a vehicle with special or identification plates is no longer entitled to those plates; and a person shall not operate, and an owner shall not knowingly permit to be operated, upon any highway, a vehicle unless the license plate is so attached. A special permit or temporary license plate issued in lieu of permanent license plates shall be attached and displayed on the vehicle for which the permit
 or temporary license plate was issued until the temporary license plate or the special
 permit expires, or the permanent license plates are received, whichever occurs first.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 18.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

This chapter does not apply to plates which the department pursuant to law has ordered to be surrendered, transferred to another vehicle, or removed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

(a) (1) Except as provided by subdivisions (b) and (c), a tab shall indicate the year of expiration and a tab shall indicate the month of expiration. Current month and year tabs shall be attached to the rear license plate assigned to the vehicle for the last preceding registration year in which license plates were issued, and, when so attached, the license plate with the tabs shall, for the purposes of this code, be deemed to be the license plate, except that truck tractors, and commercial motor vehicles having a declared gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more, shall display the current month and year tabs upon the front license plate assigned to the truck tractor or commercial motor vehicle. Vehicles that fail to
 display current month and year tabs or display expired tabs are in violation of this section.

(2) (A) (i) A violation of paragraph (1) shall not be the sole basis for any enforcement action before the second month after the month of expiration of the vehicle’s registration.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), if a vehicle is stopped for any other violation of this code, enforcement action for a violation of paragraph (1) may be taken before the second month following the month of expiration.

(B) This paragraph shall be operative from July 1, 2024, to January 1, 2030, inclusive.

(b) The requirement of subdivision (a) that the tabs indicate the year and the month of expiration does not apply to fleet vehicles subject to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301) or vehicles defined in Section 468.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply when proper application
 for registration has been made pursuant to Section 4602 and the new
 indicia of current registration have not been received from the department.

(d) This section is enforceable against any motor vehicle that is driven, moved, or left standing upon a highway, or in an offstreet public parking facility, in the same manner as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4000.

(e) Prior to issuing a citation for a violation of this section, a law enforcement officer shall verify, using available department records, that no current registration exists for that vehicle. A citation shall not be issued for failure to comply with this section against any vehicle that has a current registration on file with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.   (AB 256)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.5.

The department shall post on its Internet Web site, and any other appropriate online venue used by the department for public outreach, detailed instructions for motorists that describe how to prevent theft of the tabs described in Section 5204.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 776, Sec. 3.   (SB 773)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

The department may make appropriate rules and regulations for the use and display of stickers or devices issued in lieu of license plates, and shall publish a summary thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.5.

(a) (1) For purposes of implementing Section 21655.9, the department shall make available for issuance, for a fee determined by the department to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the reasonable costs incurred pursuant to this section, and pursuant to the eligibility provisions in subdivision (b), distinctive decals, labels, and other identifiers that clearly distinguish the following vehicles from other vehicles:

(A) A vehicle that meets the state’s super ultra-low emission vehicle (SULEV) standard for exhaust emissions and the federal inherently low-emission vehicle (ILEV) evaporative emission standard, as defined in Part 88 (commencing with Section 88.101-94)
 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) A vehicle that was produced during the 2004 model year or earlier and meets the state’s ultra-low emission vehicle (ULEV) standard for exhaust emissions and the federal ILEV standard. A decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to this paragraph is valid until January 1, 2019.

(C) A vehicle that meets the state’s enhanced advanced technology partial zero-emission vehicle (enhanced AT PZEV) standard or transitional zero-emission vehicle (TZEV) standard.

(2) (A) A decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) before January 1, 2017, is valid until January 1, 2019.

(B) (i) A decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) on or after January 1, 2017, and before March 1, 2018, is valid until January 1, 2019.

(ii) A decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) between March 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019, is valid until January 1, 2022.

(iii) A decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) on or after March 1, 2018, for a vehicle that had been issued a decal, label, or other identifier pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) between January 1, 2017, and March 1, 2018, is valid until January 1, 2022.

(C) Except as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B), a decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) on or after January 1, 2019, is valid until January 1 of the fourth year after the year of issuance.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding the validity timeframe specified in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), commencing January 1, 2020, and until January 1, 2024, a decal, label, or other identifier may be issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) for a vehicle that had previously been issued a decal, label, or other identifier, and the decal, label, or other identifier shall be valid until January 1, 2024, if the applicant for the decal, label, or other identifier has a household income at or
 below 80 percent of the state median income, as designated by the Department of Housing and Community Development’s list of state income limits adopted pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code. The determination of income eligibility shall be made by a governmental or nonprofit entity selected by the department, in a format prescribed by the department.

(B) A person who obtained a decal, label, or other identifier for a vehicle prior to January 1, 2017, shall not be issued another decal, label, or other identifier pursuant to this paragraph, notwithstanding the person’s qualifying income.

(C) The department shall report to the Legislature the number of decals, labels, and other identifiers issued pursuant to this paragraph. The report shall be issued after January
 1, 2023, but before June 1, 2023.

(4) Except as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) and paragraph (3), a vehicle shall not be issued a decal, label, or other identifier more than once.

(b) (1) The department shall not issue a decal, label, or other identifier to an applicant who has received a consumer rebate pursuant to the Clean Vehicle Rebate Project, established as part of the Air Quality Improvement Program pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44274) of Chapter 8.9 of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, for a vehicle purchased on or after January 1, 2018, unless the rebate was issued to a buyer whose gross annual income falls below one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a person who files a
 tax return as a single person, two hundred four thousand dollars ($204,000) for a person who files a tax return as a head of household, and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for a person who files a joint tax return.

(2) The department shall collaborate with the State Air Resources Board to establish procedures to implement this subdivision, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The application form for a decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to this section and the application for a rebate under the Clean Vehicle Rebate Project shall include a statement indicating that the applicant cannot participate in both programs unless the applicant meets the income restrictions in paragraph (1). Each application shall require the applicant to
 provide a signature to confirm that the applicant understands this condition.

(B) Notify consumers of the eligibility criteria and conditions using existing education and outreach efforts.

(C) Establish appropriate compliance and enforcement measures.

(D) Establish information sharing between the department and the board to implement the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) The department shall include a summary of the provisions of this section on each motor vehicle registration renewal notice, or on a separate insert, if space is available and the summary can be included without incurring additional printing or postage costs.

(d) The Department of Transportation shall remove individual HOV lanes, or portions of those lanes, during periods of peak congestion from the access provisions provided in subdivision (a), following a finding by the Department of Transportation as follows:

(1) The lane, or portion of the lane, exceeds a level of service C, as discussed in subdivision (b) of Section 65089 of the Government Code.

(2) The operation or projected operation of the vehicles described in subdivision (a) in these lanes, or portions of those lanes, will significantly increase congestion.

(3) The finding shall also demonstrate the infeasibility of alleviating the congestion by other means, including, but not limited to, reducing the use
 of the lane by noneligible vehicles or further increasing vehicle occupancy.

(e) The State Air Resources Board shall publish and maintain a list of all vehicles eligible for participation in the programs described in this section. The board shall provide that list to the department.

(f) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the department, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, shall design and specify the placement of the decal, label, or other identifier on the vehicle. Each decal, label, or other identifier issued for a vehicle shall display a unique number, which shall be printed on, or affixed to, the vehicle registration.

(2) Except as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), decals, labels, or other identifiers issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) before January 1, 2019, shall be distinguishable from the decals, labels, or other identifiers issued on or after January 1, 2019.

(g) If the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, serving as the Bay Area Toll Authority, grants toll-free and reduced-rate passage on toll bridges under its jurisdiction to a vehicle pursuant to Section 30102.5 of the Streets and Highways Code, it shall also grant the same toll-free and reduced-rate passage to a vehicle displaying a valid identifier issued by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(h) (1) Notwithstanding Section 21655.9, and except as provided in paragraph (2), a vehicle described in subdivision (a) that displays a valid decal, label, or identifier issued pursuant to this section shall be granted a toll-free or reduced-rate passage in high-occupancy toll lanes as described in Section 149.7 of the Streets and Highways Code unless prohibited by federal law.

(2) (A) Paragraph (1) does not apply to the imposition of a toll imposed for passage on a toll road or toll highway, that is not a high-occupancy toll lane as described in Section 149.7 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(B) Paragraph (1) does not apply to the imposition of a toll charged for crossing a state-owned bridge.

(i) If the Director of Transportation determines that federal law does not authorize the state to allow vehicles that are identified by distinctive decals, labels, or other identifiers on vehicles described in subdivision (a) to use highway lanes or highway access ramps for high-occupancy vehicles regardless of vehicle occupancy, the Director of Transportation shall submit a notice of that determination to the Secretary of State.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on the date the federal authorization pursuant to Section 166 of Title 23 of the United States Code expires, or the date the Secretary of State receives the notice described in subdivision (i), whichever occurs first.

(k) If this section becomes inoperative
 pursuant to subdivision (j) the driver of a vehicle with an otherwise valid decal, label, or other identifier issued pursuant to this section shall not be cited for a violation of Section 21655.9 within 60 days of the date that this section becomes inoperative.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   (AB 2678)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on date prescribed in subd. (j).    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

Vehicles for which weight fees are paid on a partial year basis shall display a certificate or insignia issued by the department, which shall state the end of the period for which the vehicle is licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 636, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Registration of Fleet Vehicles [5301. - 5309.]

5301.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the registered owner or lessee of a fleet of vehicles consisting of commercial motor vehicles base plated in the state, or passenger automobiles may, upon payment of appropriate fees, apply to the department for license plates, permanent decals, and registration cards.

(b) (1) Fleets shall consist of at least 25 motor vehicles to qualify for this program. However, the department may provide for permanent fleet registration through an association providing a combination of fleets of
 motor vehicles of 125 or more vehicles with no individual fleet of fewer than 25 motor vehicles.

(2) An association submitting an application of participation in the program shall provide within the overall application a listing identifying the registered owner of each fleet and the motor vehicles within each fleet. Identification of the motor vehicles as provided in this article applies to the ownership of the motor vehicles and not the association submitting the application.

(c) With the concurrence of both the department and the participant, the changes made in this section by the enactment of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001 shall not affect those participants who were lawfully participating in the permanent fleet registration program on December 31, 2001. Any
 fleet that qualifies for permanent fleet registration as of December 31, 2001, will continue to count trailers to qualify as a fleet until January 1, 2007. However, five years following the implementation of the permanent trailer identification program, all participants in the permanent fleet registration program shall meet the requirements of this section in order to continue enrollment in the program described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 441, Sec. 2.   (AB 458)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

(a) Motor vehicles registered in any state other than California are not permitted to participate in this program.

(b) Section 4604 does not apply to vehicles registered under this article.

(c) The department may conduct an audit of the records of each fleet owner or lessee of the vehicle fleets electing to participate in the program. The department shall be fully reimbursed by the fleet owner or lessee for the costs of conducting the audits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 441, Sec. 3.   (AB 458)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

(a) The applicant for initial issuance of permanent registration or renewal of registration shall file an application in such form as the department shall require.

(b) Upon initial application, the department shall issue a distinguishing license plate or decal which indicates that the vehicle has been registered under this article.

(c) Display of the distinguishing license plate or decal and registration card shall constitute prima facie evidence that the vehicle is currently registered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

Renewal fees shall be paid pursuant to a schedule established by the department. Submission of renewal fees by an association pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5301 shall be specific as to each fleet and vehicle thereof covered by the renewal application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 986, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

In addition to any other fees due for motor vehicles registered pursuant to this article, the department may charge and collect a service fee of one dollar ($1) for each fleet motor vehicle at the time the initial application is submitted to the department and at the time of registration renewal of each fleet vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 35.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

5306.

Upon payment of appropriate fees, the license plate or decal and registration card issued pursuant to this article for the vehicle shall remain valid until the provisions of Section 5307 have been met.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5307.

(a) A fleet vehicle registered under this article may be deleted from the identified fleet when the fleet operator notifies the department of the proposed deletion on a form approved by the department and the distinguishing license plate or decal and registration card issued for the vehicle are surrendered to the department.

(b) Failure to comply with subdivision (a) will require that the payment of fees due for the registration of the vehicle shall be the responsibility of the fleet owner as though the vehicle remained part of the fleet.

(c) The fees determined to be due and owing under this article shall be a lien upon all vehicles of the applicant of a type subject to registration under this code, and the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 shall apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5308.

The director shall adopt procedures for initial application, payment of fees, fleet additions or deletions, and for the cancellation of the distinguishing plates or decals and registration card issued to a vehicle of a fleet owner or lessee who does not comply with this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5309.

The registration of any identified fleet vehicle is required annually.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Registration of Trailer Coaches [5350. - 5354.]

5350.

The provisions of this division shall apply to trailer coaches except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 975, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

5351.

Sections 4452, 4604, 5904, 6052, and 9254, and subdivision (a) of Section 9552 do not apply to the registration or renewal of registration of any trailer coach.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5352.

Subject to the exemptions stated in Section 5353, registration of any trailer coach in this state is required annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 975, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.

The registration provisions of this article shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any trailer coach which is driven or moved upon a highway in any of the following circumstances:

(1) In conformance with the provisions of this code relating to dealers, manufacturers, transporters, or nonresidents.

(2) Under a temporary permit issued by the department as authorized by Section 4156.

(3) Under a one-trip permit issued by the department as authorized by Section 4003 when such permit is issued to a nonresident.

(b) Any unoccupied trailer coach which is part of an inventory of trailer coaches held for sale by a manufacturer or dealer in the course of his business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 975, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

5354.

The registration of a foreign trailer coach owned by a nonresident shall be subject to and governed by Section 6700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Surrender of Registration Documents and License Plates [5500. - 5506.]

5500.

(a) Any person, other than a licensed dismantler, desiring to disassemble a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code, either partially or totally, with the intent to use as parts only, to reduce to scrap, or to construct another vehicle shall deliver to the department the certificate of ownership, the registration card, and the license plates last issued to the vehicle before dismantling may begin.

(b) Any person who is convicted of violating subdivision (a) shall be punished upon a first conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days or more than six months, or by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) or more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both that fine and imprisonment; and, upon a second or any subsequent conviction, by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days or more than one year, or by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1022, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

The provisions of Sections 4457, 4458, and 4459 shall not apply when a vehicle is reported for dismantling. However, any person desiring to dismantle a vehicle shall, in accordance with Section 5500 or 11520, surrender to the department the certificate of ownership, registration card, and license plate or plates last issued for the vehicle. In the event the person so reporting is unable to furnish the certificate of ownership, registration card, and license plate or plates last issued to the vehicle, or any of them, the department may receive the report and application, examine into the circumstances of the case, and may require the filing of suitable affidavits, or other information or documents. No duplicate certificate of ownership, registration card, license plate or plates will be issued when a vehicle is reported for dismantling. No fees shall be required for acceptance of any affidavit provided pursuant to this section or on account of any stolen, lost or damaged certificate, card, plate or plates or duplicates thereof, unless the vehicle is subsequently registered in accordance with Section 11519.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5505.

(a) This section applies to any vehicle reported to be a total loss salvage vehicle pursuant to Section 11515 and to any vehicle reported for dismantling pursuant to Section 5500 or 11520.

(b) Whenever an application is made to the Department of Motor Vehicles to register a vehicle described in subdivision (a), that department shall inspect the vehicle to determine its proper identity or request that the inspection be performed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. An inspection by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall not preclude that department from referring the vehicle to the Department of the California Highway Patrol for an additional inspection if deemed necessary.

(c) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall inspect, on a random basis, those vehicles described in subdivision (a) that have been presented to the Department of Motor Vehicles for registration after completion of the reconstruction process to determine the proper identity of those vehicles. The vehicle being presented for inspection shall be a complete vehicle, in legal operating condition. If the vehicle was originally manufactured with a “supplemental restraint system” as defined in Section 593, the reconstructed vehicle shall also be equipped with a supplemental restraint system in good working order that meets applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards and conforms to the manufacturer’s specifications for that vehicle. The inspection conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be a comprehensive, vehicle identification number inspection.

(d) A salvage vehicle rebuilder, as defined in Section 543.5, or other individual in possession of a vehicle described in subdivision (a), who is submitting the vehicle for registration as described in subdivision (b), shall have available, and shall present upon demand of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, bills of sale, invoices, or other acceptable proof of ownership of component parts, and invoices for minor component parts. Additionally, bills of sale and invoices shall include the year, make, model, and the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the parts were removed or sold, the name and signature of the person from whom the parts were acquired, and his or her address, and telephone number. To assist in the identification of the seller of new or used parts, the number of the seller’s driver’s license, identification card, social security card, or Federal Employer Identification Number shall be provided by the seller to the buyer on the bills of sale and invoice. The seller of a salvage vehicle, or the agent of the seller, shall inform the purchaser of the vehicle that ownership documentation for certain replacement parts used in the repair of the vehicle will be required in the inspection required under this section.

(e) As used in this section, the term “component parts for passenger motor vehicles” includes supplemental restraint systems, the cowl or firewall, front-end assembly, rear clip, including the roof panel, the roof panel when installed separately, and the frame or any portion thereof, or in the case of a unitized body, the supporting structure that serves as the frame, each door, the hood, each fender or quarter panel, deck lid or hatchback, each bumper, both T-tops, replacement transmissions or transaxles, and a replacement motor.

(1) As used in this subdivision, “front-end assembly” includes all of the following: hood, fenders, bumper, and radiator supporting members for these items. For vehicles with a unitized body, the front-end assembly also includes the frame support members.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “rear clip” includes the roof, quarter panels, trunk lid, floor pan, and the support members for each item.

(f) As used in this section, “major component parts for trucks, truck-type or bus-type vehicles” includes the cab, the frame or any portion thereof, and, in the case of a unitized body, the supporting structure which serves as a frame, the cargo compartment floor panel or passenger compartment floor pan, roof panel, and replacement transmissions or transaxles, and replacement motors, each door, hood, each fender or quarter panel, each bumper, and the tailgate. All component parts identified in subdivision (e), common to a truck, truck-type or bus-type vehicle, not listed in this section, shall be considered as included in this section if the part is replaced.

(1) “Major component parts for motorcycles” includes the engine or motor, transmission or transaxle, frame, front fork, and crankcase.

(2) “Minor component parts for motorcycles” includes the fairing and any other body molding.

(g) If the vehicle identification number, year, make, or model required under subdivision (d) cannot be determined, the Department of the California Highway Patrol may accept, in lieu of that information, a certification on a form provided by that department, signed by the person submitting the vehicle for inspection, that the part was not obtained by means of theft or fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.

No salvage vehicle rebuilder may resell or transfer ownership of any vehicle that is subject to inspection as provided in Section 5505, unless either a certificate of inspection issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or vehicle verification form completed by an authorized employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles is provided to the buyer upon sale or transfer. Responsibility for compliance with this section shall rest with the salvage vehicle rebuilder selling or transferring the vehicle. This section shall not apply to a salvage vehicle rebuilder who has applied for and received a title in accordance with Section 5505.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Transfers of Title or Interest [5600. - 6105.]



  ARTICLE 1. Procedure to Transfer [5600. - 5604.5.]

5600.

(a) No transfer of the title or any interest in or to a vehicle registered under this code shall pass, and any attempted transfer shall not be effective, until the parties thereto have fulfilled either of the following requirements:

(1) The transferor has made proper endorsement and delivery of the certificate of ownership to the transferee as provided in this code and the transferee has delivered to the department or has placed the certificate in the United States mail
 addressed to the department when and as required under this code with the proper transfer fee, together with the amount required to be paid under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code with respect to the use by the transferee of the vehicle, and thereby makes application for a transfer of registration except as otherwise provided in Sections 5905, 5906, 5907, and 5908.

(2) The transferor has delivered to the department or has placed in the United States mail addressed to the department the appropriate documents for the registration or transfer of registration of the vehicle pursuant to the sale or transfer except as provided in Section 5602.

(b) Whenever a person transfers ownership of a vehicle and is required to disclose the mileage of the vehicle, the department may prescribe a secured form to be used for purposes of the odometer
 mileage disclosure requirements pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 32705 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.5.

Ownership of title to a vehicle subject to registration may be transferred to two (or more) coowners as transferee to be held provided in Section 682 of the Civil Code, except that:

(a) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or.” A vehicle so registered in the alternative shall be deemed to be held in joint tenancy. Each coowner shall be deemed to have granted to the other coowners the absolute right to dispose of the title and interest in the vehicle. Upon the death of a coowner the interest of the decedent shall pass to the
 survivor as though title or interest in the vehicle was held in joint tenancy unless a contrary intention is set forth in writing upon the request for transfer of registration.

(b) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or” and if declared in writing upon the application for a transfer of registration by the applicants to be community property, or tenancy in common, shall grant to each coowner the absolute power to transfer the title or interest of the other coowners only during the lifetime of such coowners.

(c) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the conjunctive by the use of the word “and” and shall thereafter require the signature of each coowner or his personal representative to transfer title to the vehicle, except where title to the vehicle is set
 forth in joint tenancy, the signature of each coowner or his personal representative shall be required only during the lifetime of the coowners, and upon death of a coowner title shall pass to the surviving coowner.

(d) The department may adopt suitable abbreviations to appear upon the certificate of registration and certificate of ownership to designate the manner in which the interest in or title to the vehicle is held if set forth by the coowners upon the application for transfer of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

5601.

Section 5600 does not apply to involuntary transfers, as upon the taking of possession by a secured party under a security agreement, or to transfers involving the creation of security interests subject to Chapter 3, commencing at Section 6300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.
